app/agents/word_discovery/FST/class.verb.lexc
LEXICON V3IrrPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@neng^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ # ;
[Imp]:0^ # ;
[Irr]:yi^ # ;

LEXICON V4aPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj ;
[PERSIST]:yind^ PERSISTSConj ;
0:0 V4aConj ;

LEXICON V4aConj
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@m^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@~om^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ # ;
[Imp]:0^ # ;
[Irr]:yinj^ # ; 
[Irr]:yi^ # ; 

LEXICON V4bPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj ;
[PERSIST]:yindi^ PERSISTSConj ;
0:0 V4bConj ;

LEXICON V4bConj
[Irr]:+ninj^ # ; 
[Irr]:yi^ # ; 
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ # ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[Imp]:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@~om^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ # ;

LEXICON V5aPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@ng^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@y^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ngi^ # ;
[Imp]:0^ # ;
[Irr]:yinj^ # ; 

LEXICON V5bPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj ;
[PERSIST]:~indi^ PERSISTSConj ;
0:0 V5bConj ;

LEXICON V5bConj
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@ng^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@~i^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ngi^ # ;
[Imp]:0^ # ;
[Irr]:yi^ # ; 
[Irr]:yinj^ # ;

LEXICON V5cPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@ng^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@~ey^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ngi^ # ;
[Imp]:0^ # ;
[Irr]:yi^ # ; 

LEXICON V6aPostBase
[RR]:ngerre^ RRConj ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ # ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@ngen^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@nj^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@nginj^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@nj^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ngeni^ # ;
[Imp]:ngimen^ # ;
[Irr]:ngemeninj^ # ; 

LEXICON V7aPostBase
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@0^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@0^ # ;
[Imp]:n^ # ;
[Irr]:wirrinj^ # ;

LEXICON V8PostBase  
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ # ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@ngen^ # ;  
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@y^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@nginj^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@y^ # ;
[Imp]:~un^ # ;
[Irr]:~uwirrinj^ # ; 


LEXICON V9PostBase
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@an^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@i^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@anj^ # ;
[Imp]:a^ # ;
[Irr]:~angemeninj^ # ; 

LEXICON V10PostBase
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@~inj^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ # ;
[Imp]:men^ # ;
[Irr]:=imeninj^ # ;
[Irr]:~imeninj^ # ;


LEXICON V11PostBase
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@men^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@minj^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@meni^ # ;
[Imp]:mimen^ # ;
[Irr]:meninj^ # ;
[RR]:merre^ RRConj ;
[PERSIST]:yindi^ PERSISTSConj ;

LEXICON ReVerbs
@R.TENSE.NP@re[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@(r)e^ # ;                            ! go
@R.TENSE.P@re[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@wam^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@re[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@(r)ey^ # ;
re[Imp]:(r)ay^ # ;
re[Irr]:(r)ayinj^ # ;

LEXICON NonverbalPostBase
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@minj^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ # ;
[Imp]:nin^ # ;
[Irr]:niwirrinj^ # ;

LEXICON IrregularVerbsIntr
@R.TENSE.NP@bengmid[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@bengmiddan^ # ;                ! forget
@R.TENSE.P@bengmid[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@bengmiddanj^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@bengmid[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@bengmiddangeni^ # ;
bengmid[Imp]:bengmiddangimen^ # ;
bengmid[Irr]:bengmiddangemeninj^ # ;

@R.TENSE.NP@bore[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@bore^ # ;                          ! flow (water)
@R.TENSE.P@bore[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@bowam^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@bore[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@borey^ # ;
bore[Imp]:boray^ # ;
bore[Irr]:borayinj^ # ;

@R.TENSE.NP@dungre[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@dungre^ # ;                     ! movement of the sun
@R.TENSE.P@dungre[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@dungwam^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@dungre[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@dungrey^ # ;
dungre[Imp]:dungray^ # ;
dungre[Irr]:dungrayinj^ # ;

@R.TENSE.NP@kakre[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@kakre^ # ;                       ! travel at night
@R.TENSE.P@kakre[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@kakwam^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@kakre[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@kakrey^ # ;
kakre[Imp]:kakray^ # ;
kakre[Irr]:kakrayinj^ # ;

@R.TENSE.NP@kurlbare[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@kurlbare^ # ;                  ! travel at night
@R.TENSE.P@kurlbare[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@kurlbawam^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@kurlbare[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@kurlbarey^ # ;
kurlbare[Imp]:kurlbaray^ # ;
kurlbare[Irr]:kurlbarayinj^ # ;

@R.TENSE.NP@wohre[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@wohre^ # ;                        ! wander, walk around
@R.TENSE.P@wohre[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@wohwam^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@wohre[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@wohrey^ # ;
wohre[Imp]:wohray^ # ;
wohre[Irr]:wohrayinj^ # ;

LEXICON IrregularVerbsTrns
@R.TENSE.NP@mulewan[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@mulewan^ # ;                    ! inform
@R.TENSE.P@mulewan[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@mulewam^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@mulewan[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@mulewani^ # ;

LEXICON RRConj
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@~inj^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ # ;
[Imp]:~emen^ # ;
[Irr]:~imeninj^ # ;

LEXICON PERSISTSConj
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@~i^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@~anj^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@~i^ # ;
[Imp]:~imen^ # ;
[Irr]:~angimeninj^ # ;

LEXICON IntransitiveVerbs
0:0 IrregularVerbsIntr ;                                ! there are a couple irregular intransitive^ Verbs to treat explicitly 
bal:bal^ ReVerbs;
barlid:barlid^ V9PostBase ;
bolkngeyyo:bolkngeyyo^ V8PostBase ;
bo:bo^ ReVerbs;                                             ! flow 
boyboyyo:boyboyyo^ V8PostBase ;
burnbu:burnbu^ V4bPostBase ;
burre:burre^ V10PostBase ;                                     ! fight
da:da^ V6aPostBase ;                                           ! stand, come live in a place
dahkendi:dahkendi^ V7aPostBase ;
daleh:daleh^ V11PostBase ;                                     ! dry up, get dry
dangwerre:dangwerre^ V10PostBase ;                             ! argue with each other
dedjdo:dedjdo^ V5aPostBase ;                                   ! copulate (vulg)
di:di^ V7aPostBase ;                                           ! be, be standing
dirri:dirri^ V7aPostBase ;                                      ! play
djabd:djabd^ V9PostBase ;
djabda:djabda^ V6aPostBase ;                                    ! stick up
djal:djal^ ReVerbs; 
djangdi:djangdi^ V7aPostBase ;
djongburre:djongburre^ V10PostBase ;                            ! get dressed
dowerre:dowerre^ V10PostBase ;
dubberra:dubberra^ V10PostBase ;
dukkayindi:dukkayindi^ V7aPostBase ;
dulubu:(rr)ulubu^ V4aPostBase ;                          ! shoot, spear, penetrate, puncture, 2. flow into, intersect INTR
dungbang:dungbang^ V11PostBase ;
dung:dung^ ReVerbs; 
durnde:durnde^ V5bPostBase ;                             ! return, go back
durnde:rdurnde^ V5bPostBase ;                                   ! return, go back (alternate pelling)
durnde:rrurnde^ V5bPostBase ;                                   ! return, go back (alternate spelling)
durre:durre^ V10PostBase ;                               ! abuse or curse each other
gerremadbu:gerremadbu^ V4aPostBase ;                     ! wait for something to cook
kak:kak^ ReVerbs;                                    ! travel at night
kare:kare^ V11PostBase ;                                 ! become old
karu:karu^ V5aPostBase ;                                      ! dig (intr)
kerlk:kerlk^ V11PostBase ;
kerremadbu:kerremadbu^ V4aPostBase ;                     ! wait for something to cook (alternate spelling)
keyo:keyo^ V8PostBase ;                                  ! lie down
kongibu:kongibu^ V4bPostBase ;                          ! feel compassion
kunidi:kunidi^ V7aPostBase ;
kurlba:kurlba^ ReVerbs;                             ! bleed
kurre:kurre^ V10PostBase ;                              ! decieve, trick
kuwa:kuwa^ V4aPostBase ;
mak:mak^ V11PostBase ;                                  ! become good
marre:marre^ V10PostBase ;                              ! marry
mimbi:mimbi^ V7aPostBase    ;                            ! alive
mok:mok^ V11PostBase;                                   ! develop a sore, get an infection
ngalkbu:ngalkbu^ V4bPostBase ;                                   ! cry, weep
ngeydi:ngeydi^ V7aPostBase ;
ngeyyo:ngeyyo^ V8PostBase ;
ngolekwarre:ngolekwarre^ V11PostBase ;
ngu:ngu^ V3IrrPostBase ;                                     ! eat (intrans)
ngudjwarre:ngudjwarre^ V11PostBase ;
ngukde:ngukde^ V5bPostBase ;                                    ! defecate
ningihni:ningihni^ V7aPostBase ;
nud:nud^ V11PostBase ;
0:0^ ReVerbs;                                               ! re  - to go
rra:rra^ V6aPostBase ;                                       ! stand, come live in a place
ru:ru^ V5aPostBase ;                                        ! be hot, burn, 2. cook, 3 ripen        
wakwa:wakwa^ V4aPostBase ;                                     ! be unaware, not know, forget to undertake
wareyo:wareyo^ V8PostBase ;
warnamyo:warnamyo^ V8PostBase ;
weldi:weldi^ V7aPostBase ;
weleberrkmen:weleberrk^ V11PostBase;                       ! droop, sag, wrinkle
woh:woh^ ReVerbs;                                       ! wander, walk around
wolebukkiyo:wolebukkiyo^ V8PostBase ;
worrk:worrk^ V11PostBase ;                                     ! be full of food
wurdme:wurdma^ V5cPostBase ;
yawa:yawa^ V4aPostBase ;                                      ! seek
yikadjurre:yikadjurre^ V10PostBase ;
yimerrange:yimerrange^ V10PostBase ;                                ! turn into
yirriyo:yirriyo^ V8PostBase ;
yo:yo^ V8PostBase ;                                         ! lie
yongen:yo^ V6aPostBase ;
LEXICON TransitiveVerbs
0:0 IrregularVerbsTrns ;                ! there are a couple irregular transitive verbs to treat explicitly 
babbulibu:babbulibu V4bPostBase ;
babma:babma V5cPostBase ;
baddje:baddje^ V5bPostBase ;                                    ! bash
badjdje:badjdje^ V5bPostBase ;
bimbu:bimbu^ V4bPostBase ;                                     ! draw, paint, write
bimma:bimma^ V5cPostBase ;
borndu:borndu^ V5aPostBase ;
borrkbu:borrkbu^ V4bPostBase ;
burrbu:burrbu^ V4bPostBase ;                                    ! understand, know, think (something)
dahkendo:dahkendo^ V5aPostBase ;
djalkma:djalkma^ V5cPostBase ;
djare:djare NonverbalPostBase ;                                      ! want
djarrangbu:djarrangbu^ V4bPostBase ;                                ! sort
djawa:djawa^ V4aPostBase ;                                     ! ask
djirdma:djirdma^ V5cPostBase ;                                   ! steal
djumdo:djumdo^ V5aPostBase ;
du:du^ V5aPostBase ;                                        ! swear at
dudma:dudma^ V5cPostBase ;
durndiwe:durndiwe^ V5bPostBase ;                   ! cause to return, go back
gerremadbu:gerremadbu^ V4aPostBase ;                ! wait for something to cook
kardma:kardma^ V5cPostBase ;                    ! snare, catch
karu:karu^ V5aPostBase ;                      ! dig
kebngu:kebngu^ V3IrrPostBase; 
kerremadbu:kerremadbu^ V4aPostBase ;                ! wait for something to cook (alternate spelling)
kukburrbu:kukburrbu^ V4bPostBase ;
lowkma:lowkma^ V5cPostBase ;
malelma:malelma^ V5cPostBase ;
manjngu:manjngu^ V3IrrPostBase; 
marnbu:marnbu^ V4aPostBase ;                                    ! make, build, do, complete, fix, heal, organize, arrange
marnedjare:marnedjare NonverbalPostBase ;                                 ! love, desire
marrkma:marrkma^ V5cPostBase ;
munkekadju:munkekadju^ V5aPostBase ;
ngeybu:ngeybu^ V4bPostBase ;
ngorrma:ngorrma^ V5cPostBase ;
ngu:ngu^ V3IrrPostBase ;                                     ! eat (something)
ngudjkadju:ngudjkadju^ V5aPostBase ;
ngukde:ngukde^ V5bPostBase ;
rrurndiwe:rrurndiwe^ V5bPostBase ;                 ! cause to return, go back
warlbu:warlbu^ V4aPostBase ;                                    ! hunt, gather
wirlarrkngukde:wirlarrkngukde^ V5bPostBase; 
yilkbu:yilkbu^ V4bPostBase ;
